Washington statutes.
RCW 3.72.050

Fee.

A court may require that a youth pay a nonrefundable fee, not exceeding thirty dollars, to cover the costs of administering the program. The fee may be reduced or waived for a participant. Fees shall be paid to and accounted for by the court. The fees collected under this section shall not constitute "certain costs" as defined in RCW * 3.46.120(2), 3.50.100(2), 3.62.020(2), 3.62.040(2), and 35.20.220(2).

[ 2002 c 237 s 6.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 3.46.120 was repealed by 2008 c 227 s 12, effective July 1, 2008.